Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1608
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that matters relating to the establishment, modification, and enforcement of child, spousal, or medical support should be handled by the district courts, separate juvenile courts, and county courts in an expeditious manner so that parties may obtain needed orders and other action as quickly as possible.

Laws 1989, LB 265, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 20;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 48.